Nominalstest.lexc
! Nominals test
Multichar_Symbols
@U.ALIEN.NO@
@U.ALIEN.YES@
@U.ADJ.YES@
@U.ADJ.NO@
@U.VAR.YES@ 
@U.VAR.NO@ 
@U.NOM.YES@
@U.Pref.YES@

!Symbols for nouns, adjectives and adpositions
LEXICON Root
    AdjPossclass ; !Build Adjectives
    Nouns ; !Build Nouns
    ! Verbs ; ! Build Verbs

LEXICON AdjPossclass 
@U.ALIEN.NO@@U.ADJ.YES@ Adjectives ; !Mark Adjectives as inalienable and as adjectives

LEXICON Adjectives
ts'ama SetE ;

LEXICON SetE !Possession for the inalienable nouns and some adjective functions
@U.ALIEN.NO@@U.ADJ.NO@-3sg.poss:@U.ALIEN.NO@@U.ADJ.NO@-h # ; ! Only allow inalienable non adjectives
@U.ALIEN.NO@@U.ADJ.YES@-3sg.poss:@U.ALIEN.NO@@U.ADJ.YES@-h # ; ! Only allow inalienable adjectives (This is the only suffix they allow).
# ; ! Allow all to be bare stems

LEXICON Nouns
! ! @U.ADJ.NO@  Diminutive ;
@U.ADJ.NO@    IalNclass ; !Build Inalienable Nouns never have prefixes only suffixes
@U.ALIEN.YES@ AlNclass ; ! Build alienable Nouns optionally have prefixes never suffixes
@U.ADJ.NO@    VarNclass ; ! Build Varaiable Nouns variably have prefixes or suffixes
               SetB ; ! Prefixes

! ! LEXICON Diminutive 
! ! @U.ALIEN.YES@@U.VAR.NO@dim-:@U.ALIEN.YES@@U.VAR.NO@chu- SetB ;
! ! @U.ALIEN.NO@dim-:@U.ALIEN.NO@chu- IalNclass ;
! ! @U.ALIEN.YES@@U.VAR.NO@dim-:@U.ALIEN.YES@@U.VAR.NO@chu- AlNclass ;
! ! @U.VAR.YES@dim-:@U.VAR.YES@chu- VarNclass ;

 LEXICON SetB !possession for the alienable nouns, verbal nouns and tv incompletive
 1sg:ɨn- SetBFunction ;
! ! ! @U.Pref.NO@ TVroots ;

 LEXICON SetBFunction
! ! !  @U.NOM.NO@.incomp-:@U.NOM.NO@0 TVroots ;
! ! ! ! @U.NOM.YES@.poss-:@U.NOM.YES@0 TVroots ;
! ! ! ! @U.NOM.YES@.poss-:@U.NOM.YES@0 IVclass ;
.poss-:0 AlNclass ; ! Add possessive function of prefix to alienable nouns

LEXICON IalNclass 
         IalN ;
         ProperNouns ;

LEXICON IalN
nuuru Num;

LEXICON ProperNouns
hwan # ;

LEXICON AlNclass
@U.ALIEN.YES@  Countnouns ;
@U.ALIEN.YES@  Massnouns ;

LEXICON Countnouns
huurak Num ;

LEXICON Massnouns
 uy # ;

LEXICON VarNclass
@U.ALIEN.YES@ SetB ;
@U.ALIEN.NO@ VarN ;

LEXICON VarN
mɨn'a Num ;

LEXICON Num
.sg:0 SetE ;
-pl:-lh%{F%} SetE ;




! ! LEXICON Verbs
! ! @U.TV.YES@  Transitive ;
! ! @U.TV.NO@   Intransitive ;

! ! LEXICON Transitive 
! ! @U.COMP.NO@@U.NOM.NO@ SetB ; !Incompletive forms
! ! @U.COMP.NO@@U.NOM.YES@ SetB ; !Verbal Nouns
! ! @U.COMP.YES@@U.NOM.NO@ TVroots ; !Completive forms

! ! LEXICON Intransitive
! ! @U.NOM.NO@ IVPrefixes ; !Complete and incompletive forms
! ! @U.NOM.YES@ IVclass ; ! Verbal nouns

! ! LEXICON SetB ! possession for the verbal nouns and tv incompletive
! ! @U.Pref.YES@1sg:@U.Pref.YES@ɨn- SetBFunction ;
! ! @U.Pref.NO@ TVroots ;

! LEXICON SetBFunction
! @U.NOM.NO@.incomp-:@U.NOM.NO@0 TVroots ;
! @U.NOM.YES@.poss-:@U.NOM.YES@0 TVroots ;
! @U.NOM.YES@.poss-:@U.NOM.YES@0 IVclass ; 

! LEXICON IVPrefixes 
! @U.COMP.YES@ SetC ;
! @U.COMP.NO@ SetD ;

! LEXICON SetC !IV completive aspect
! 1sg.comp-:ɨn- IVclass ;

! LEXICON SetD !IV incompletive aspect
! 1sg.incomp-:ɨn- IVclass ;

! LEXICON TVroots
! xuka Asp ;

! LEXICON IVclass 
! @U.NOM.NO@@U.ActIV.YES@ ActIVroots ;
! @U.NOM.NO@@U.ActIV.NO@ AffIVroots ;
! @U.NOM.YES@@U.ActIV.YES@ ActIVroots ;
! @U.NOM.YES@@U.ActIV.NO@ AffIVroots ;

! LEXICON ActIVroots
! mɨka Asp ;

! LEXICON AffIVroots
! uuka Asp ;

! LEXICON Asp
! @U.NOM.NO@@U.TV.NO@.comp:@U.NOM.NO@@U.TV.NO@0 IVclassmarker ;
! @U.COMP.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.Pref.YES@.incomp:@U.COMP.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.Pref.YES@0 # ;
! @U.COMP.NO@@U.NOM.YES@.vn:@U.COMP.NO@@U.NOM.YES@0 # ;
! @U.COMP.YES@@U.TV.YES@.comp:@U.COMP.YES@@U.TV.YES@0 SetA ;

! LEXICON IVclassmarker ! only used in completive aspect
! @U.COMP.YES@@U.ActIV.YES@.activ:@U.COMP.YES@@U.ActIV.YES@-lha' # ;
! @U.COMP.YES@@U.ActIV.NO@.affiv:@U.COMP.YES@@U.ActIV.NO@-' # ;

! LEXICON SetA
! -1sg.comp:-n' # ;
